Illinois, session 104th, HB4978.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 9, 10, 13, 16.1, and 17.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 25/9)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2309)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)8    Sec. 9. Qualifications of applicants for dental licenses. 9The Department shall require that each applicant for a license 10to practice dentistry shall:11        (a) (Blank).12        (b) Be at least 21 years of age and of good moral 13    character.14        (c) (1) Present satisfactory evidence of completion of 15    dental education by graduation from a dental college or 16    school in the United States or Canada approved by the 17    Department. The Department shall not approve any dental 18    college or school which does not require at least (A) 60 19    semester hours of collegiate credit or the equivalent in 20    acceptable subjects from a college or university before 21    admission, and (B) completion of at least 4 academic years 22    of instruction or the equivalent in an approved dental 23    college or school that is accredited by the Commission on   HB4978- 2 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1    Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association; 2    or3        (2) Present satisfactory evidence of completion of 4    dental education by graduation from a dental college or 5    school outside the United States or Canada and provide 6    satisfactory evidence that the applicant has: (A) 7    completed a minimum of 2 academic years of general dental 8    clinical training and obtained a doctorate of dental 9    surgery (DDS) or doctorate of dental medicine (DMD) at a 10    dental college or school in the United States or Canada 11    approved by the Department; or (B) met the program 12    requirements approved by rule by the Department.13        Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent 14    either the Department or any dental college or school from 15    establishing higher standards than specified in this Act.16        (d) (Blank).17        (e) Present satisfactory evidence that the applicant 18    has passed the integrated National Board Dental 19    Examination administered by the Joint Commission on 20    National Dental Examinations and has successfully 21    completed an examination conducted by one of the following 22    regional testing services: the Central Regional Dental 23    Testing Service, Inc. (CRDTS) or the American Board of 24    Dental Examiners (ADEX). , the Southern Regional Testing 25    Agency, Inc. (SRTA), the Western Regional Examining Board 26    (WREB), the Commission on Dental Competency Assessments   HB4978- 3 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1    (CDCA), or the Council of Interstate Testing Agencies 2    (CITA). An applicant who has passed the integrated 3    National Board Dental Examination and who has, prior to 4    January 1, 2026, successfully completed an examination 5    conducted by the States Resources for Testing and 6    Assessments, Inc. (SRTA) (formerly, Southern Regional 7    Testing Agency, Inc.), the Western Regional Examining 8    Board (WREB), the Commission on Dental Competency 9    Assessments (CDCA), or the North East Regional Board of 10    Dental Examiners (NERB) shall be eligible to apply for 11    licensure. For purposes of this Section, "successfully 12    completed" means successful completion shall mean that the 13    applicant has achieved a minimum passing score as 14    determined by the applicable regional testing service. The 15    Secretary may suspend a regional testing service under 16    this subsection (e) if, after proper notice and hearing, 17    it is established that (i) the integrity of the 18    examination has been breached so as to make future test 19    results unreliable or (ii) the test is fundamentally 20    deficient in testing clinical competency. 21    In determining professional capacity under this Section, 22any individual who has not been actively engaged in the 23practice of dentistry, has not been a dental student, or has 24not been engaged in a formal program of dental education 25during the 5 years immediately preceding the filing of an 26application may be required to complete such additional   HB4978- 4 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1testing, training, or remedial education as the Board may deem 2necessary in order to establish the applicant's present 3capacity to practice dentistry with reasonable judgment, 4skill, and safety.5(Source: P.A. 102-93, eff. 1-1-22.) 6    (225 ILCS 25/10)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2310)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)8    Sec. 10. Examinations for dental licensure. Examination 9shall be made in writing in all theoretical subjects. Both 10theoretical and psychomotor practical examinations shall be of 11a character to give a fair test of the qualifications of the 12applicant to practice dentistry. The examination papers and 13all grading thereon, and the grading of the practical work, 14shall be deemed public documents, and preserved for a period 15of not less than 2 years after the Department shall have made 16and published its decisions thereon. All examinations shall be 17conducted or authorized under fair and wholly impartial 18methods.19(Source: P.A. 84-365.) 20    (225 ILCS 25/13)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2313)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)22    Sec. 13. Qualifications of applicants for dental hygienist 23licenses hygienists. Every person who desires to obtain a 24license as a dental hygienist shall apply to the Department in   HB4978- 5 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1writing, upon forms prepared and furnished by the Department. 2Each application shall contain proof of the particular 3qualifications required of the applicant, shall be verified by 4the applicant, under oath, and shall be accompanied by the 5required examination fee.6    The Department shall require that every applicant for a 7license as a dental hygienist shall:8        (1) (Blank).9        (2) Be a graduate of high school or its equivalent.10        (3) Present satisfactory evidence of having 11    successfully completed 2 academic years of credit at a 12    dental hygiene program accredited by the Commission on 13    Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.14        (4) Submit evidence that the applicant holds a 15    currently valid certification to perform cardiopulmonary 16    resuscitation. The Department shall adopt rules 17    establishing criteria for certification in cardiopulmonary 18    resuscitation. The rules of the Department shall provide 19    for variances only in instances where the applicant is a 20    person with a physical disability and therefore unable to 21    secure such certification.22        (5) (Blank).23        (6) Present satisfactory evidence that the applicant 24    has passed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination 25    administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental 26    Examinations and has successfully completed an examination   HB4978- 6 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1    conducted by one of the following regional testing 2    services: the Central Regional Dental Testing Service, 3    Inc. (CRDTS) or the American Board of Dental Examiners 4    (ADEX). , the Southern Regional Testing Agency, Inc. 5    (SRTA), the Western Regional Examining Board (WREB), or 6    the North East Regional Board (NERB). An applicant who has 7    passed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination 8    administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental 9    Examinations and who has, prior to January 1, 2026, 10    successfully completed an examination conducted by the 11    States Resources for Testing and Assessments, Inc. (SRTA) 12    (formerly, Southern Regional Testing Agency, Inc.), the 13    Western Regional Examining Board (WREB), the Commission on 14    Dental Competency Assessments (CDCA), or the North East 15    Regional Board (NERB) shall be eligible to apply for 16    licensure. For the purposes of this Section, "successfully 17    completed" means successful completion shall mean that the 18    applicant has achieved a minimum passing score as 19    determined by the applicable regional testing service. The 20    Secretary may suspend a regional testing service under 21    this item (6) if, after proper notice and hearing, it is 22    established that (i) the integrity of the examination has 23    been breached so as to make future test results unreliable 24    or (ii) the examination is fundamentally deficient in 25    testing clinical competency.26(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB4978- 7 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1    (225 ILCS 25/16.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2316.1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)3    Sec. 16.1. Continuing education. The Department shall 4promulgate rules of continuing education for persons licensed 5under this Act. In establishing rules, the Department shall 6require a minimum of 48 hours of study in approved courses for 7dentists during each 3-year licensing period and a minimum of 836 hours of study in approved courses for dental hygienists 9during each 3-year licensing period.10    The Department shall approve only courses that are 11relevant to the treatment and care of patients, including, but 12not limited to, clinical courses in dentistry and dental 13hygiene and nonclinical courses such as patient management, 14legal and ethical responsibilities, and stress management. The 15Department shall allow up to 4 hours of continuing education 16credit hours per license renewal period for volunteer hours 17spent providing clinical services at, or sponsored by, a 18nonprofit community clinic, local or state health department, 19or a charity event. Courses shall not be approved in such 20subjects as estate and personal financial planning, personal 21investments, or personal health. Approved courses may include, 22but shall not be limited to, courses that are offered or 23sponsored by approved colleges, universities, and hospitals 24and by recognized national, State, and local dental and dental 25hygiene organizations, such as the Illinois State Dental   HB4978- 8 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1Society. When offering a continuing education course, whether 2at no cost or for a fee, the course provider shall explicitly 3disclose that the course is an approved course for continuing 4education in the State of Illinois, as provided in this 5Section or by the rules adopted by the Department. 6    No license shall be renewed unless the renewal application 7is accompanied by an affidavit indicating that the applicant 8has completed the required minimum number of hours of 9continuing education in approved courses as required by this 10Section. The affidavit shall not require a listing of courses. 11The affidavit shall be a prima facie evidence that the 12applicant has obtained the minimum number of required 13continuing education hours in approved courses. The Department 14shall not be obligated to conduct random audits or otherwise 15independently verify that an applicant has met the continuing 16education requirement. The Department, however, may not 17conduct random audits of more than 10% of the licensed 18dentists and dental hygienists in any one licensing cycle to 19verify compliance with continuing education requirements. If 20the Department, however, receives a complaint that a licensee 21has not completed the required continuing education or if the 22Department is investigating another alleged violation of this 23Act by a licensee, the Department may demand and shall be 24entitled to receive evidence from any licensee of completion 25of required continuing education courses for the most recently 26completed 3-year licensing period. Evidence of continuing   HB4978- 9 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1education may include, but is not limited to, canceled checks, 2official verification forms of attendance, and continuing 3education recording forms, that demonstrate a reasonable 4record of attendance. The Board shall determine, in accordance 5with rules adopted by the Department, whether a licensee or 6applicant has met the continuing education requirements. Any 7dentist who holds more than one license under this Act shall be 8required to complete only the minimum number of hours of 9continuing education required for renewal of a single license. 10The Department may provide exemptions from continuing 11education requirements.12(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (225 ILCS 25/17.1)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)15    Sec. 17.1. Expanded function dental assistants.16    (a) A dental assistant who has completed training as 17provided in subsection (b) of this Section in all of the 18following areas may hold himself or herself out as an expanded 19function dental assistant:20        (1) Taking material or digital scans for final 21    impressions after completing a training program that 22    includes either didactic objectives or clinical skills and 23    functions that demonstrate competency.24        (2) Performing pulp vitality test after completing a 25    training program that includes either didactic objectives   HB4978- 10 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1    or clinical skills and functions that demonstrate 2    competency.3        (3) Placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 4    restorations and placing, packing, and finishing composite 5    restorations as allowed under Section 17.6        (3.5) Coronal scaling as allowed under Section 17. 7        (4) Starting the flow of oxygen and monitoring of 8    nitrous oxide-oxygen analgesia as allowed under Section 9    17.10        (5) Coronal polishing and pit and fissure sealants as 11    allowed under Section 17.12        (6) Intracoronal temporization of a tooth. 13    All procedures listed in paragraphs (1) through (6) for 14dental assistants must be performed under the supervision of a 15dentist, requiring the dentist authorizes the procedure, 16remains in the dental facility while the procedure is 17performed, and approves the work performed by the dental 18assistant before dismissal of the patient, but the dentist is 19not required to be present at all times in the treatment room. 20    A dental assistant may perform any of the services listed 21in paragraphs (1) through (6) if the dental assistant has 22completed the training requirements for the service or 23services. 24    After the completion of training as provided in subsection 25(b) of this Section, an expanded function dental assistant may 26perform any of the services listed in this subsection (a)   HB4978- 11 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1pursuant to the limitations of this Act.2    (b) Certification and training as an expanded function 3dental assistant must be obtained from one of the following 4sources: (i) an approved continuing education sponsor; (ii) a 5dental assistant training program approved by the Commission 6on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association; or 7(iii) a training program approved by the Department.8    Training required under this subsection (b) must also 9include Basic Life Support certification, as described in 10Section 16 of this Act. Proof of current certification shall 11be kept on file with the supervising dentist.12    (c) Any procedures listed in subsection (a) that are 13performed by an expanded function dental assistant must be 14approved by the supervising dentist and examined prior to 15dismissal of the patient. The supervising dentist shall be 16responsible for all dental services or procedures performed by 17the dental assistant.18    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter 19the number of dental assistants that a dentist may supervise 20under paragraph (g) of Section 17 of this Act.21    (e) Nothing in this Act shall: (1) require a dental 22assistant to be certified as an expanded function dental 23assistant or (2) prevent a dentist from training dental 24assistants in accordance with the provisions of Section 17 or 2517.1 of this Act or rules pertaining to dental assistant 26duties.  HB4978- 12 -LRB104 16877 AAS 30287 b1(Source: P.A. 101-162, eff. 7-26-19; 102-936, eff. 1-1-23.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on July 31, 2026.